Utah statutes.
53A-1a-110.   Computer program for students with autism and other special needs.

(1)  As used in this section, "board" means the State Board of Education.

(2)  To improve social skills and student achievement for students with autism and other special needs in pre-school through grade 2, the board shall contract with a provider, selected through a request for proposals process, to provide computer software programs and activity manuals.

(3)  In evaluating proposals submitted under Subsection (2), the board shall:

(a)  ensure that the board's evaluation criteria weighs heavily the proposer's ability and experience to provide computer software programs and activity manuals to improve social skills and student achievement for students with autism and other special needs in pre-school through grade 2;

(b)  consider, in evaluating the proposer's ability and experience, any quantitative and evaluative results from field testing, state tests, and other standardized achievement tests;

(c)  ensure that the board's evaluation criteria weighs heavily the proposer's ability to:

(i)  collect data from each computer using the computer software, regardless of where the computer is located;

(ii)  provide students access to the proposer's program from any computer with internet access;

(iii)  enable reporting of student progress to administrators, teachers, parents, and other facilitators; and

(iv)  record a student's progress in the computer software; and

(d)  consider the extent to which the computer software program uses engaging animation to teach students.

(4)  The board shall provide the computer software programs and activity manuals procured under this section to school districts and charter schools that demonstrate a commitment by the school principal and staff to implement the computer software programs and activity manuals as prescribed by the provider.

